District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.29g

Certification, enforcement, and regulation of private vehicles-for-hire.

(a)

Every 24 months, a private vehicle-for-hire company shall certify on a form provided by the Commission that the private vehicle-for-hire company has complied with the requirements of this subchapter.

(b)

The Commission is authorized to inspect and copy the relevant safety and consumer protection-related records of a private vehicle-for-hire company to ensure compliance with this subchapter when it has a reasonable basis to suspect non-compliance; provided, that any records disclosed to the Commission under this subchapter shall not be subject to disclosure to a third party by the Commission, including through a request submitted pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.].

(c)

If the Mayor determines that a private vehicle-for-hire company knowingly certified an intentionally false or misleading statement on a form required by this subchapter, the Mayor may impose a civil fine as determined by rulemaking. A civil fine prescribed by this section shall be applicable only after the private vehicle-for-hire company is afforded an opportunity for a hearing. These penalties shall be in addition to any other penalties available by law.

(d)

Failure by a private vehicle-for-hire company or operator to adhere to the requirements of this subchapter may result in sanction by the Commission, including fines and other penalties, pursuant to the Commission’s authority in § 50-301.07(c)(7).

(e)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Commission shall not require a private vehicle-for-hire company to provide the Commission with a list or inventory of private vehicle-for-hire operators or vehicles associated with a private vehicle-for-hire company.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 20j-7
as added Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-197, § 2(k), 61 DCR 12430
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-197: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-197 provided, in part, that §§ 1, 2, 3, and 4 of the act shall apply as of March 10, 2015.